Utah statutes.
32A-4a-303.   Qualifications.
(1)  A person employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the
resort spa sublicense is subject to qualification requirements of Section 32A-
4a-203.
(2)  If a person no longer possesses the qualifications required by Section
32A-4a-203 for obtaining the resort license or resort spa sublicense, the
commission may suspend or revoke the resort spa sublicense that is part of the
resort license.
